New Jersey, session 221, S1763.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a. A parent or guardian requesting home instruction due to a students temporary or chronic health condition or need for treatment that precludes participation in the students usual education setting, whether general education or special education, shall submit to the board of education a request that includes a written determination from the students physician or advanced practice nurse documenting the projected need for confinement at the students residence or other treatment setting for more than 10 consecutive school days or 20 cumulative school days during the school year. b.  The provisions of this section shall be in addition to any other requirement for the receipt of home instruction established pursuant to State Board of Education regulations. 2. This act shall take effect immediately.